Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 10

Fiduciary Powers

45-2-1001. Company authorized to act as fiduciary.

No company shall act as a fiduciary in this state except:

No company shall engage in an unauthorized trust activity. No company shall be deemed to be subject to this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, regulating fiduciary activities to the extent that the company's activities are permitted by existing statutory authority or are customarily performed as a traditional incident to the company's regular business activities.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.230); T.C.A., § 45-422; Acts 1999, ch. 112, §§ 7, 9.

Cross-References. Applicability of part to savings and loan associations and savings banks, §45-2-106.

Appointment and removal of trustees, title 35, ch. 1.

Bank acting as fiduciary on April 2, 1969, may continue without changing charter, §45-2-218.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 526.

Law Reviews.

Yes, Virginia, Tax Loopholes Still Exist: An Examination of the Tennessee Community Property Trust Act of 2010 (J. Paul Singleton), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 369 (2011).

45-2-1002. Fiduciary powers.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by statute, a bank acting as a fiduciary shall have, alone or with others, all of the rights, powers, privileges and immunities, and be subject to the same liabilities and duties as an individual fiduciary under like circumstances. The fiduciary powers include, but are not limited to, the power to act as:

Fiduciary as defined in § 35-2-102;

Custodian of property;

Agent or attorney-in-fact;

Registrar or transfer agent of securities;

Fiscal agent or any political entity, public body, corporation, unincorporated association or individual;

Investment advisor;

Insurer of titles to, mortgages on, and other interests in any real estate; and

Guarantor of the payment of bonds owned by other persons.

A bank acting as fiduciary shall have the same investment powers as an individual fiduciary under like circumstances and other investment powers that are provided by law. In exercising the powers, a bank shall, unless otherwise authorized by law or by the instrument creating the relationship, exercise the judgment and care, under the circumstances then prevailing, or as related to the specific purposes for which the fiduciary relationship was created, that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs under like circumstances. Within the limitation of the foregoing standard, a bank, as fiduciary, is authorized to acquire and retain interests in every kind of property, real, personal or mixed, and every kind of investment, specifically including, but not by way of limitation, bonds, debentures, and other corporate and governmental obligations, insurance policies, stocks, rights, warrants, and securities of any open or closed-end management fund that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence acquire for their own account; and within the limitations of the same foregoing standard, the bank may retain property properly acquired, without limitation as to time and without regard to its suitability for original purchase.

A bank, acting as fiduciary in any capacity for which an annual or periodic court accounting is required, shall not be required to exhibit to the court or the clerk thereof the originals or copies of receipts and cancelled checks for disbursements or distributions made by the fiduciary to support the accounting; provided, that the accounting consists of the bank's computer prepared statements showing all income and principal transactions for the accounting period, but the court may require that receipts and cancelled checks be exhibited for the final distribution of assets on termination or transfer of the account to a successor.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.231); T.C.A., § 45-423; Acts 1987, ch. 300, § 1.

45-2-1003. Segregation and registration of fiduciary assets — Nominee.

A bank or trust company holding any asset as a fiduciary, cofiduciary, agent for a fiduciary or custodian shall segregate the assets from any other assets of the bank except as may be expressly provided otherwise by law or by the instrument creating the fiduciary relationship and the asset may be kept by the bank or trust company.

Stocks, bonds, and other securities may be held by the bank or trust company in a manner such that all certificates representing the securities from time to time constituting the assets of a particular estate, trust or other fiduciary account are held separate from those of all other estates, trusts, or fiduciary accounts; or, in a manner such that certificates representing securities of the same class of the same issues from time to time constituting assets of particular estates, trusts, or other fiduciary accounts are held in bulk, without certification as to ownership attached; provided, that a bank or trust company when operating under the aforementioned method of safekeeping securities shall be subject to the rules and regulations now in effect or hereinafter promulgated by the state banking board with regard to state-chartered institutions and the comptroller of the currency in the case of national banking institutions.

A bank or trust company holding the securities in bulk may also merge certificates of small denominations into one (1) or more certificates of large denominations and all banks or trust companies acting as a fiduciary with regard to the securities shall on demand certify in writing the securities held by it for any estate, trust or fiduciary account.

Any bank, when acting as a fiduciary or a cofiduciary with others, or as an agent for other fiduciaries, may, with the consent of its cofiduciary or cofiduciaries, if any, who are hereby authorized to give consent, or the fiduciaries for whom it is acting, cause any investment held in such a capacity to be registered and held in its own name, or the name of a nominee, or nominees, of the bank.

The bank shall be liable for the acts of the nominee with respect to any investment so registered.

The records of the bank shall at all times show the fiduciary relationship under which the investment is held, and the securities, or a proper receipt therefor, shall be in the possession and control of the bank.

The securities shall be kept separate and apart from the assets of the bank.

Any bank may deposit funds of a fiduciary account awaiting investment or distribution in its commercial banking department or in the commercial banking department of any affiliate bank in the same bank holding company as defined in § 45-2-1402 where the funds may be used in the conduct of its business to the extent that the deposits do not exceed the aggregate of:

The insurance on the deposits provided by the federal deposit insurance corporation;

Cash on hand;

The value of obligations of the United States or any state or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof owned by the bank; and

Other property approved for this purpose for national banks or for member banks of the federal reserve system.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.232); 1974, ch. 550, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-424; Acts 1988, ch. 926, § 6.

45-2-1004. Investment in undivided interest in property.

A bank may, subject to the limitations of this section, create undivided interests in property of any nature for the purpose of sale from time to time to accounts held by the bank in any fiduciary capacity. The bank may retain a portion of the undivided interests for its own account if the property is one that it would be authorized to acquire pursuant to this chapter wholly for its own account.

The limitations on the undivided interest shall be:

The interest shall be one that:

The bank would be authorized to acquire pursuant to this chapter and chapter 1 of this title wholly for its own account, and, in the absence of broader investment powers under the terms upon which it was designated as fiduciary, would also be authorized to acquire as a legal investment for funds held by fiduciaries; or

The bank would be authorized to acquire as an investment by the terms upon which it was designated as fiduciary of each account in which it acquires an undivided interest;

Interests not retained by the bank may be sold only to a fiduciary account.

The bank shall exercise all rights of ownership in respect of an interest in which undivided interests have been sold pursuant to this section, and in respect of any property acquired by foreclosure or otherwise in connection with the interest, in its own name but for the benefit of itself and all other owners of the undivided interests in the property.

The bank shall at all times maintain records of all undivided interests created pursuant to this section showing the extent of the undivided interest of each owner of the interest.

The bank may issue a certificate evidencing each undivided interest created pursuant to this section, keep records showing the holders of the certificates, provide for transfer of a certificate by the registered holder of the certificate upon surrender of the certificate and deal with the registered holder of a certificate as the owner of the undivided interest represented by the certificate. Each certificate shall contain a summary of the rights of an owner of the undivided interest represented thereby and expressly disclaim any guarantee by the bank of payment of any amount.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.233); T.C.A., § 45-425.

45-2-1005. Fiduciary bond or oath excused.

No oath or bond shall be required of a bank to qualify upon appointment as a fiduciary, unless the instrument creating a fiduciary position expressly provides otherwise.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.234); T.C.A., § 45-426.

Cross-References. Bond of personal representative, §30-1-201.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 526.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-705.

45-2-1006. Deposit of securities in federal reserve bank when acting as fiduciary authorized.

Any bank or trust company, when acting as a fiduciary, or when holding securities as custodian for a fiduciary, is authorized to deposit, or arrange for the deposit of, with the federal reserve bank in its district, any securities, the principal of and interest on which the United States, or any department, agency or instrumentality thereof, has agreed to pay, has guaranteed to pay, or has guaranteed payment in the manner so as to be credited to one (1) or more accounts on the books of the federal reserve bank in the name of the bank or trust company, to be designated fiduciary or safekeeping accounts.

The bank or trust company so depositing securities with the federal reserve bank shall be subject to the rules and regulations with respect to the making and maintenance of the deposits that, in the case of state chartered institutions, the commissioner, and, in the case of national banking associations, the comptroller of the currency, may from time to time issue.

The records of the bank or trust company shall at all times show the ownership of the securities held in the account.

Ownership of, and other interest in, the securities credited to the account may be transferred by entries on the books of the federal reserve bank without physical delivery of any securities.

A bank or trust company acting as a custodian for a fiduciary shall, on demand by the fiduciary, certify in writing to the fiduciary the securities so deposited by the bank or trust company with the federal reserve bank for the account of the fiduciary.

A fiduciary shall, on demand by any party to its accounting or on demand by the attorney for the party, certify in writing to the party the securities deposited by the fiduciary with the federal reserve bank for its account as the fiduciary.

This section shall apply to all fiduciaries and custodians for fiduciaries, acting on May 3, 1973, or who thereafter may act, regardless of the date of the instrument or court order by which they are appointed.

Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1973, ch. 384, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. § 45-447.

45-2-1007. Deposit of securities in central depository.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any bank or trust company holding securities as a fiduciary, cofiduciary, agent for a fiduciary or custodian pursuant to § 45-2-1003(a) and (b), is authorized to deposit or arrange for the deposit of the securities in a clearing corporation, as defined in § 47-8-102.

When the securities are so deposited, certificates representing securities of the same class of the same issuer may be merged and held in bulk in the name of the nominee of the clearing corporation with any other securities deposited in the clearing corporation by any person, regardless of the ownership of the securities, and certificates of small denomination may be merged into one (1) or more certificates of larger denominations.

The records of the bank or trust company acting as a fiduciary, cofiduciary, agent for a fiduciary or custodian, shall at all times show the name of the party for whose account the securities are so deposited.

Title to the securities may be transferred by bookkeeping entry on the books of the clearing corporation without physical delivery of certificates representing the securities.

A bank or trust company so depositing securities pursuant to this section shall be subject to the rules and regulations as, in the case of state-chartered institutions, the commissioner and, in the case of national banking associations, the comptroller of the currency may from time to time issue.

A bank or trust company acting as agent for a fiduciary or custodian shall, on demand by the fiduciary, certify in writing to the fiduciary the securities so deposited by the bank or trust company in the clearing corporation for the account of the fiduciary.

This section shall apply to any bank or trust company holding securities as a fiduciary, cofiduciary, agent for a fiduciary or custodian acting on March 6, 1978, or who thereafter may act, regardless of the date, agreement, instrument, or court order by which it is appointed and regardless of whether or not the fiduciary, cofiduciary, agent for a fiduciary or custodian, owns capital stock of the clearing corporation.

Acts 1978, ch. 575, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-448.

45-2-1008. Transfer of fiduciary accounts — Substitute fiduciaries.

Absent written objection from the commissioner, a bank, trust company or trust department, referred to in this section as the “transferor,” may transfer one (1) or more fiduciary accounts administered by the bank, trust company or trust department to another bank, trust company or trust department, referred to in this section as the “transferee”; provided that the transferee bank has trust powers.

Approval of the commissioner shall be deemed granted in the absence of written objection from the commissioner within ten (10) business days after receipt by the commissioner of written notice from the transferor bank of the proposed transfer.

Within thirty (30) days after the date of the transfer of the fiduciary accounts, the transferor shall send written notice by first class mail to the last known address (as then set forth on the records of transferor, or if not set forth, as may be determined by the transferor in the exercise of reasonable diligence) of the following persons or entities:

For employee benefit plans, to the plan sponsors;

For individual retirement accounts and retirement accounts for the self-employed, to the account owners;

For agency and escrow accounts, to the principals;

For securities for which a transferor bank serves as trustee, registrar, transfer agent or paying agent, to the issuers;

For revocable trusts under agreement, to the settlors;

For irrevocable trusts under agreement, to any co-fiduciary, to the settlor, to each current income beneficiary who is an adult, and if a current income beneficiary is a minor, to a parent of the minor with whom the minor resides or to the conservator or guardian of the minor. For purposes of this subsection (c), “current income beneficiary” means a person currently entitled to income from a trust or a person to whom the trustee, in the trustee's discretion, may currently pay principal or income;

For testamentary trusts, to the persons notified under subdivision (c)(1)(F);

For conservatorships, to any co-fiduciary, to the protected person for whom the conservatorship was created, or if the conservatorship was created for a minor, to a parent of the minor with whom the minor resides or to the guardian of the minor;

For guardianships, to any co-fiduciary, to the minor or legally incapacitated person for whom the guardian was appointed if the ward is at least fourteen (14) years of age;

For probate estates, to any co-fiduciary, to the surviving spouse, if any, and to those persons notified pursuant to subdivision (c)(1)(G); and

For corporate trust indentures to the issuer of the securities subject to each indenture; provided, that notwithstanding the foregoing, the transferor may, if it deems it appropriate, comply with any notice procedures contained in the trust indenture instrument with respect to succession of trustees.

For purposes of this section, notice shall be deemed effective when mailed by the transferor. Should the transferor learn after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the transfer that through inadvertence, error, neglect or otherwise, notice was not mailed as herein provided, delayed notice may be given in the manner set forth herein. The recipient of the notice shall then have thirty (30) days to object to the transfer as provided in subsection (d).

Any person given notice pursuant to subsection (c) may file a written objection to the fiduciary transfer with the commissioner, stating grounds for objection, within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice of the transfer by the person notified pursuant to subsection (c). The transferor shall then have thirty (30) days to either:

Abandon the transfer of fiduciary accounts to which objection was given and hold the transfer for nought; or

Submit a written response to the commissioner addressing the objections to the transfer. The commissioner shall either approve or deny the transfer.

Nothing shall preclude the transferor from appointing a related bank, trust company or trust department as its agent for the performance of any and all fiduciary obligations as provided in subsection (h).

Within a reasonable time after the date of a transfer of the fiduciary accounts in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsections (c) and (d), the transferor shall file an affidavit in the office of the chancery court of the county in which the main office of the transferor is located; and from time to time, the transferor may file a copy of the affidavit in the office of the chancery court in other counties that the transferor deems appropriate. The affidavit shall set forth the names and addresses of the transferor and transferee, identification of the fiduciary accounts transferred that the transferor deems appropriate, and other information that the transferor deems desirable.

In the event that notice of objection to the transfer is received by the transferor after the filing of record of the original affidavit with respect to the transfer, and in the event that pursuant to subsection (d), the transfer is abandoned, the transferor shall promptly file notice of the abandonment in the office of the appropriate chancery court.

If a bank, trust company or trust department completes a fiduciary transfer, the bank, trust company or trust department to which the fiduciary accounts have been transferred shall be automatically substituted as the fiduciary of all the accounts so transferred without further action and without any order or decree by any court or public officer; and without the transfer being treated or considered as a resignation by the transferor as a fiduciary; and the transferee bank, trust company or trust department shall have all the rights, duties, responsibilities, obligations and liabilities, financial or otherwise, of the transferor bank with respect to the accounts. A bank, trust company or trust department that completes a fiduciary transfer shall be relieved as fiduciary without an accounting and without any order or decree of any court or public officer, and prospectively shall have no continuing duties, responsibilities, obligations or liabilities, financial or otherwise, with respect to the accounts transferred. The transfer shall not, however, relieve the transferor bank of liability on the transferee for action or inaction prior to the transfer, nor shall it impose liability on the transferee for action or inaction of the transferor prior to the transfer. The transfer shall not constitute a relinquishment of trust powers by the transferor bank.

A transferor bank, trust company or trust department is related to a transferee bank, trust company or trust department if:

The transferee controls the transferor;

The transferor controls the transferee;

The same entity controls, directly or indirectly, the transferor and the transferee;

A majority of the directors of the transferor are directors of the transferee; or

A majority of the directors of the transferee are directors of the transferor.

“Control” and “controls,” as used in subdivision (g)(1), means the ownership of a majority of the voting shares of another bank, trust company or of the bank operating the trust department.

Regardless of objection to any fiduciary transfer as provided in subsection (d) and the outcome of the objection, and notwithstanding any procedure under this chapter, any bank may appoint a related bank, trust company or trust department as its agent for the performance of any or all acts, obligations and responsibilities of the bank with respect to any fiduciary account. A bank, trust company or trust department may also delegate, to an unrelated party pursuant to a written agreement, any investment, management or administrative function if the bank, trust company or trust department exercises reasonable care, judgment and caution in:

Selecting the agent, taking into consideration the agent’s financial standing and reputation;

Establishing the scope and other terms of any delegation; and

Reviewing periodically the agent’s actions in order to monitor overall performance and compliance with the scope and other terms of the delegation.

In the event of a delegation pursuant to subdivision (h)(1), the appointing bank shall remain fully responsible and liable with respect to all actions of the related bank, trust company, trust department or unrelated party as if performed by the appointing bank itself. The agency relationship shall not:

Be deemed an impermissible delegation of responsibility or duty by the appointing bank;

Constitute a resignation or disqualification of the appointing bank as fiduciary or relinquishment of trust powers by the appointing bank; or

Require the consent of any person, entity, court or other governmental authority.

Acts 1984, ch. 691, §§ 2-5; 1987, ch. 300, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 768, § 22; 1999, ch. 112, § 8; 2010, ch. 725, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-2-1009. Trust offices.

No bank shall operate any trust office for the purpose of conducting a general banking business, including, but not limited to, receiving deposits, paying checks, making loans, or receiving or discounting bills and notes at any place where it is prohibited from establishing a branch bank for this purpose.

A bank at any trust office may receive money or other things of value, disburse funds, extend credit and otherwise perform all acts necessary or appropriate for it to carry out its obligations and duties as fiduciary if the activity is otherwise lawful.

Acts 1984, ch. 691, § 6.

45-2-1010. Fiduciary activities of state trust institution.

A state trust institution may act as a fiduciary in this or any other state or foreign country, subject to complying with applicable laws of the state or foreign country.

In addition, a state trust institution may conduct any activities at any office outside this state that are permissible for a trust institution chartered by the host state where the office is located, except to the extent the activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any regulation or order of the commissioner applicable to the state trust institution; provided, that the commissioner may waive the prohibition if the commissioner determines that the involvement of out-of-state offices of state trust institutions in particular activities would not threaten the safety or soundness of the state trust institutions.

A state trust institution may:

Perform any act as a fiduciary at each trust office established under this title and at an authorized branch; and

Exercise any incidental power that is reasonably necessary to enable it to fully exercise commonly accepted fiduciary powers conferred in this chapter and chapter 1 of this title.

A state trust institution may exercise any other power authorized by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, or any power authorized to federally chartered trust institutions whose purposes and powers are limited to fiduciary purposes and powers, subject to the commissioner's regulation for safety and soundness. A state trust institution may exercise any power authorized to trust institutions chartered by another state whose purposes and powers are limited to fiduciary purposes and powers, subject to the commissioner's regulation for safety and soundness.

Acts 1984, ch. 691, § 6; 1999 ch. 112, § 10.

Cross-References. Branch banking, §45-2-614.

45-2-1011. Fiduciary activities of out-of-state trust institution.

An out-of-state trust institution that establishes and maintains one (1) or more offices in this state under this chapter may conduct any activity at each office that would be authorized under the laws of this state for a state trust institution to conduct at the office.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.

45-2-1012. State trust company principal office.

Each state trust company must have and continuously maintain a principal office in this state.

A state trust company shall apply to the commissioner to change its location or the location of any of its offices pursuant to § 45-2-218.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.

45-2-1013. Trust office.

A state trust institution may establish or acquire and maintain trust offices anywhere in this state. Any prohibition on the acquisition of an institution that has not been in operation for at least three (3) years shall not apply to trust companies. A state trust institution desiring to establish or acquire and maintain an office shall file a written notice with the commissioner setting forth the name of the state trust institution, the location of the proposed additional office, furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the additional office and pay the filing fee prescribed by the commissioner. If acquiring a trust office, the trust institution shall provide evidence that all fiduciary obligations and liabilities of the parties have been properly discharged or otherwise assumed.

The notificant may commence business at the additional office on the thirty-first day after the date the commissioner receives the notice, unless the commissioner specifies an earlier or later date.

The acquiring trust institution shall succeed by operation of law to all of the rights, privileges and obligations of the selling trust institution.

The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the commissioner on a determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the state trust institution may establish the additional office only on prior written approval by the commissioner.

The commissioner may deny approval of the additional office if the commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed office would be contrary to the public interest.

A state trust institution may also establish and maintain a new trust office or acquire and maintain an office outside of this state. In addition to the notice required to be provided in subsection (a), the trust institution must also provide evidence that the laws of the jurisdiction where the office is to be located permit an office, a copy of the authorizing board resolution and the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner. The process of review in subsections (b), (d) and (e) shall be applicable. The commissioner shall also consider the views of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10; 2003, ch. 32, § 7.

45-2-1014. Out-of-state trust institution trust office.

An out-of-state trust institution may act as a fiduciary from a trust office only if it maintains:

An office in this state as permitted by this chapter; or

A branch in this state.(2) Similar institutions chartered under the laws of Tennessee are permitted to establish or acquire offices and engage in substantially similar activities permitted to out-of-state trust institutions by this chapter in the state where the out-of-state trust institution has its principal office.

An out-of-state trust institution desiring to establish or acquire and maintain a trust office in this state pursuant to this part shall provide, or cause its home state regulator to provide, written notice of the proposed transaction to the commissioner on or after the date on which the out-of-state trust institution applies to the home state regulator for approval to establish and maintain or acquire the office. The notice shall set forth the name of the out-of-state trust institution, the location of the proposed office, satisfactory evidence that the notificant is a trust institution, furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the office and pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner. If acquiring a trust office, the out-of-state trust institution shall provide evidence that all fiduciary obligations and liabilities of the parties have been properly discharged or otherwise assumed. Any prohibition on the acquisition of an institution that has not been in operation for at least three (3) years shall not apply to trust companies.

The acquiring trust institution shall succeed by operation of law to all of the rights, privileges and obligations of the selling trust institution. The acquisition alone shall not result in the establishment of a branch.

An out-of-state trust institution may not establish or acquire a trust office in this state unless:

The notificant shall have provided satisfactory evidence to the commissioner of compliance with:

Any applicable requirements of title 48; and

The applicable requirements of its home state regulator for acquiring or establishing and maintaining the office; and (2) The commissioner, acting within sixty (60) days after receiving notice, shall have certified to the home state regulator that the requirements of this section have been met and the notice has been approved or, if applicable, that any conditions imposed by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (e) have been satisfied.

The out-of-state trust institution may commence business at the trust office on the sixty-first day after the date the commissioner receives the notice unless the commissioner specifies an earlier or later date; provided, that with respect to an out-of-state trust institution that is not a depository institution and for which the commissioner has conditioned approval on the satisfaction by the notificant of any requirement applicable to a state trust company, the institution shall have satisfied the conditions and provided the commissioner satisfactory evidence of satisfaction of the conditions. The sixty-day period of review may be extended by the commissioner on a determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the out-of-state trust institution may establish the office only on prior written approval by the commissioner.

The commissioner may deny approval of the office if the commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed office is contrary to the public interest. In acting on the notice, the commissioner shall consider the views of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

An out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office in this state under this section may establish or acquire additional trust offices in this state to the same extent that a state trust institution may establish or acquire additional offices in this state pursuant to the procedures for establishing or acquiring the offices.

If an out-of-state trust institution does not act as a fiduciary through the establishment or acquisition of a trust office or through an authorized branch office, it may engage in other fiduciary related activities in Tennessee including, but not limited to, marketing, soliciting and operating through a trust representative office only to the extent that the home state of the out-of-state trust institution permits state trust institutions to engage in similar activities in the other state.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10; 2002, ch. 656, § 1; 2003, ch. 32, § 8.

45-2-1015. Name of trust institution.

A state trust company or out-of-state trust institution may use any name in connection with establishing an office in this state pursuant to this chapter, except that the commissioner may determine that a name proposed to be used is potentially misleading to the public and require the company or institution to select a name that is not potentially misleading.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.

45-2-1016. Designation of trustee.

Any person residing in this state may designate any trust institution to act as a fiduciary on behalf of the person.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.

45-2-1017. Choice of law governing trust and fiduciary investments.

Any trust institution that maintains a trust office in this state and its affected clients may designate as the state whose laws shall govern any written agreement between the trust institution and its client or any instrument under which the trust institution acts for a client and with respect to the fiduciary investment standards applicable to the agreements, either:

This state;

A state where affected clients reside; or

The state where the trust institution has its principal office.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.

45-2-1018. Engaging in commerce prohibited.

A state trust company may not invest its funds in trade or commerce by buying, selling, or otherwise dealing in goods or by owning or operating a business not related to its fiduciary business, except as necessary to fulfill a fiduciary obligation to a client.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.

45-2-1019. Pledge of assets.

A state trust company may not pledge or create a lien on any of its assets except:

To secure the repayment of money borrowed;

As specifically authorized or required by § 45-2-611; or

By rules adopted under this chapter.

An act, deed, conveyance, pledge, or contract in violation of this section is void.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.

45-2-1020. Merger authority.

A state trust company may merge with another trust company or into a depository institution pursuant to the applicable provisions of part 13 of this chapter, or as otherwise permitted. However, any requirement that an institution must be in operation for three (3) years before engaging in a merger transaction shall not apply to trust companies. Mergers of state trust companies into a resulting out-of-state trust institution is permitted to the same extent that the other state's law permits Tennessee trust institutions to merge with trust companies of the other state. If a state trust company merges into an out-of-state trust institution, the resulting out-of-state trust institution may operate a trust office at the location of the state trust company pursuant to the notice requirements for the offices under this chapter, but the office shall not constitute a branch.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10; 2003, ch. 32, § 9.

45-2-1021. Sale of assets.

The board of a state trust company, with the commissioner's approval, may cause a state trust company to sell all or substantially all of its assets, including the right to control accounts established with the trust company, without shareholder approval if the commissioner finds the:

Interests of the state trust company's clients and creditors are jeopardized because of insolvency or imminent insolvency of the state trust company; and

Sale is in the best interest of the state trust company's clients and creditors.

A sale under this section must include an assumption and promise by the buyer to pay or otherwise discharge:

All of the state trust company's liabilities to clients;

All of the state trust company's liabilities for salaries of the state trust company's employees incurred before the date of the sale;

Obligations incurred by the commissioner arising out of the supervision or sale of the state trust company; and

Fees and assessments due the department.

This section does not affect the commissioner's right to take action under another law. The sale by a trust company of all or substantially all of its assets with shareholder approval is considered a voluntary dissolution and liquidation and is governed by § 45-2-1501.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 10.